Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2226
License on inactive status; reinstatement.

Any licensed practical nurse or registered nurse whose license has been placed on inactive status due to a change in primary state of residence under the Nurse Licensure Compact may apply to reinstate his or her license upon (1) change in primary state of residence back to Nebraska or to another noncompact state, (2) meeting the continuing competency requirements, and (3) paying the renewal fee.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 782.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.